South Dakota, session 2026, HB1324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 2-1-1.1 be AMENDED:
2-1-1.1. A petition sponsor shall file, in a physical and electronic copy format, a
petition for an initiated amendment to the South Dakota Constitution, as it is to be
circulated, with the secretary of state before the petition may be circulated and at least
one year before the next general election at which the initiated amendment to the
constitution is proposed to be submitted to the voters. The petition must:
(1) Be accompanied by the full text of the initiated amendment in fourteen-point font;
(2) Designate, in fourteen-point font, the date of the general election at which the
initiated amendment is to be submitted;
(3) Contain, in fourteen-point font, the title and explanation of the initiated
amendment as prepared by the attorney general, pursuant to § 12-13-25.1;
(4) Contain the fiscal note, if any, prepared pursuant to § 2-9-30, in fourteen-point
font;
(5) Be accompanied by a notarized affidavit form, signed by each person who is a
petition sponsor, which includes the name and address of each petition sponsor;
and
(6) Be accompanied by a statement of organization as provided in § 12-27-6.
The title to be contained on a petition for an initiated amendment, pursuant to
subdivision (3), must be included on both sides of the sheet of paper on which the petition
is printed. The title printed on the back side of the petition must be printed in at least
sixteen-point font.
Only an individual who is registered as a voter of this state, pursuant to chapter
12-4, may be a petition sponsor for an initiated amendment to the constitution.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 2 1324
Each petition circulator shall provide to each individual who signs the petition a
circulator handout containing the title of the initiated amendment to the Constitution, as
prepared by the attorney general; the full text of the initiated amendment to the
Constitution; the name, phone number, and email address of each petition sponsor; and
a statement indicating whether the petition circulator is a volunteer or a paid circulator
and, if a paid circulator, the amount the circulator is being paid. The secretary of state
must approve the circulator handout for each initiated amendment to the Constitution
before the petition is circulated.
A petition for an initiated amendment to the constitution may not be circulated
more than twenty-four months before the general election that was designated pursuant
to subdivision (2). A sworn affidavit, signed by at least two-thirds of the petition sponsors,
stating that the documents filed constitute the entire petition and to the best of the
knowledge of the sponsors contains a sufficient number of signatures, must also be filed
with the secretary of state. The initiated amendment petition signatures must be filed with
the secretary of state by the first Tuesday in February of a general election year for the
initiated amendment to qualify for submission to the voters at the next general election.
The State Board of Elections secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the
petition, including petition size and petition font size for ballot measure language not
prescribed in this section.
Section 2. That § 2-1-1.2 be AMENDED:
2-1-1.2. A petition sponsor shall file, in physical and electronic copy format, a
petition for an initiated measure, as it is to be circulated, with the secretary of state,
before the petition may be circulated and at least one year before the next general election
at which the initiated measure is proposed to be submitted to the voters. The petition
must:
(1) Be accompanied by the full text of the initiated measure in fourteen-point font;
(2) Designate, in fourteen-point font, the date of the general election at which the
initiated measure is to be submitted;
(3) Contain, in fourteen-point font, the title and explanation of the initiated measure
as prepared by the attorney general, pursuant to § 12-13-25.1;
(4) Contain the fiscal note, if any, prepared pursuant to § 2-9-30, in fourteen-point
font;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 3 1324
(5) Be accompanied by a notarized affidavit form signed by each person who is a
petition sponsor, which includes the name and address of each petition sponsor;
and
(6) Be accompanied by a statement of organization as provided in § 12-27-6.
The title to be contained on a petition for an initiated amendment, pursuant to
subdivision (3), must be included on both sides of the sheet of paper on which the petition
is printed. The title printed on the back side of the petition must be printed in at least
sixteen-point font.
Only an individual who is registered as a voter of this state, pursuant to chapter
12-4, may be a petition sponsor for an initiated measure.
Each petition circulator shall provide to each individual who signs the petition a
circulator handout containing the title of the initiated measure as prepared by the attorney
general; the full text of the initiated measure; the name, phone number, and email
address of each petition sponsor; and a statement indicating whether the petition
circulator is a volunteer or a paid circulator and, if a paid circulator, the amount the
circulator is being paid. The secretary of state must approve the circulator handout for
each initiated measure before the petition is circulated.
A petition for an initiated measure may not be circulated more than twenty-four
months before the general election that was designated pursuant to subdivision (2). A
sworn affidavit, signed by at least two-thirds of the petition sponsors, stating that the
documents filed constitute the entire petition and to the best of the knowledge of the
sponsors contains a sufficient number of signatures, must also be filed with the secretary
of state. The initiated measure petition signatures must be filed with the secretary of state
by the first Tuesday in February of a general election year for the initiated measure to
qualify for submission to the voters at the next general election.
The State Board of Elections secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the
petition, including petition size and petition font size for ballot measure language not
prescribed in this section.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 2-1:
For an initiated amendment to the South Dakota Constitution or an initiated
measure to qualify for submission to the voters at the general election designated on the
petition, pursuant to § 2-1-1.1 or 2-1-1.2, the petition sponsors must file the petition
signatures with the secretary of state before five p.m. central time on the first Tuesday in
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 4 1324
May of the general election year designated on the petition. The petition signatures must
be filed along with the verifications completed pursuant to § 2-1-10.
A sworn affidavit, signed by at least two-thirds of the petition sponsors, must be
filed with the secretary of state along with the signatures on the petition, stating:
(1) The documents filed constitute the entire petition; and
(2) The petition contains, to the best knowledge of the petition sponsors, at least the
number of valid signatures required by S.D. Const., Art. III, § 1, or S.D. Const.,
Art. XXIII, § 1.
The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the affidavit.
Section 4. That § 2-1-3 be AMENDED:
2-1-3. Any law which the Legislature may have enacted, except one that may be
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, shall must, upon the filing of
a petition as provided in this chapter, be submitted to a vote of the electors of the state
at the next general election. The A petition shall to submit a law enacted by the Legislature
to a vote of the electors of the state must be signed by not less than at least five percent
of the qualified electors of the state. The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the
petition, including petition size and petition font size, shall be prescribed by the State
Board of Elections.
Section 5. That § 2-1-3.1 be AMENDED:
2-1-3.1. A petition sponsor shall file, in physical and electronic format, a petition
to refer a law, as it is to be circulated, with the secretary of state before the petition may
be circulated. The petition must:
(1) Contain, in fourteen-point font, the title of the referred law;
(2) Contain the effective date of the referred law in fourteen-point font;
(3) Contain the date of the general election at which the referred law is to be submitted
in fourteen-point font;
(4) Be accompanied by a notarized form signed by each person who is a petition
sponsor, which includes the names and addresses of each petition sponsor; and
(5) Be accompanied by a statement of organization as provided in § 12-27-6.
The title required to be contained on a petition to refer a law, pursuant to
subdivision (1), must be included on both sides of the sheet of paper on which the petition
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 5 1324
is printed. The title printed on the back side of the petition must be printed in at least
sixteen-point font.
Only an individual who is registered as a voter of this state, pursuant to chapter
12-4, may be a petition sponsor for a petition to refer a law.
The petition circulator shall provide to each person individual who signs the petition
a circulator handout containing the title of the referred law; the name, phone number,
and email address of each petition sponsor; a statement whether the petition circulator is
a volunteer or paid circulator and, if a paid circulator, the amount the circulator is being
paid. The secretary of state must approve the circulator handout for each referred law
before the petition is circulated.
The signatures on a petition to refer a law must be filed with the secretary of state
within ninety days after the Legislature that passed the referred law adjourned sine die.
A sworn affidavit, stating that the documents filed constitute the entire petition and, to
the best knowledge of the sponsors, contain at least the number of valid signatures
required by S.D. Const., Art. III § 1, must be signed by at least two-thirds of the petition
sponsors and filed with the secretary of state, along with the petition signatures.
The State Board of Elections secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the
petition and affidavit.
Section 6. That § 12-1-3 be AMENDED:
12-1-3. Terms used in this title mean:
(1) "Ballot question committee," as defined by § 12-27-1 a person that raises, collects,
or disburses contributions for the purpose of:
(a) Proposing a ballot question;
(b) Opposing the placement of a ballot question on the ballot; or
(c) Advocating for the adoption or defeat of one or more ballot questions;
(2) "Candidate," a person whose name is on the ballot or who is entitled to be on the
ballot to be voted upon for nomination or election at any election an individual who
seeks nomination for or election to a public office and:
(a) Raises, collects, or disburses contributions in excess of five hundred dollars;
(b) Has authorized the solicitation of contributions or the making of
expenditures;
(c) Has been certified as a candidate by a political party;
(d) Has created a candidate campaign committee for the purpose of obtaining
public office; or
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 6 1324
(e) Has taken all actions required by state law to qualify for nomination or
election to a public office;
(3) "Election," any election held under the laws of this state;
(4) "Election officials," state and local officials charged with the duty of conducting
elections and the canvass of returns;
(5) "Elector," a person qualified to register as a voter, whether or not the person is
registered;
(6) "Electronic pollbook," an electronic system containing both the digital information
system that contains a jurisdiction's registration list and pollbook;
(7) "General election," the vote required to be taken in each voting precinct of the
state on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each even-
numbered year;
(4) "Independent candidate," any registered voter who, regardless of party affiliation,
seeks election to public office without party affiliation;
(5) "Independent" or "no party affiliation," any individual who, when registering as a
voter, does not provide a party affiliation when completing the voter registration
application, draws a line through the space provided to provide a party affiliation
when completing the application, or who writes on the application:
(a) Independent;
(b) I;
(c) Ind.;
(d) No party affiliation;
(e) No party;
(f) No choice; or
(g) Nonpartisan;
(8) "Paid circulator," any person who receives money or anything of value for collecting
signatures for a petition;
(9) "Party office," an office of a political party organization as distinct from a public
office;
(10)(6) "Person in charge of an election," or "person charged with the conduct of an
election," the county auditor in all cases except local elections for a municipality,
school district, township, or other political subdivision, in which case it is the officer
or, in a political subdivision election, the individual having the position comparable
to the auditor in that unit of government subdivision, if not specifically designated
by law;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 7 1324
(11)(7) "Petition," a form prescribed by the State Board of Elections, which contains
the question or candidacy being petitioned, the declaration of candidacy if required
and the verification of the circulator. If multiple sheets of paper are necessary to
obtain the required number of signatures, each sheet shall be self-contained and
separately verified by the circulator secretary of state, on which signatures may be
collected and by which a ballot question is proposed, a political party is organized,
or a candidate qualifies to be included on a ballot for nomination or election to a
public office;
(12)(8) "Petition circulator," a resident of the State of South Dakota as defined under
§ 12-1-4, who is at least eighteen years of age who circulates nominating petitions
or other petitions for the purpose of placing candidates or issues on any election
ballot an individual who:
(a) Is a resident of this state, as defined in § 12-1-4;
(b) Is at least eighteen years old; and
(c) In the presence of another individual, solicits from the other individual a
signature on a petition by presenting or otherwise making the petition
available to the other individual or acting in concert with another petition
circulator who presents or otherwise makes the petition available to the
other individual;
(13)(9) "Political party," beginning with the 2014 general election and each general
election thereafter, a party whose candidate for any statewide office received at
least two and one-half two-and-one-half percent of the total votes cast for that
statewide office in either of the two previous general election cycles;
(14)(10) "Pollbook" or "poll list," a list containing, in numerical order the names of all
persons voting, the name of each individual registered and eligible to vote at the
an election and type of ballot voted that the individual is eligible to receive;
(15)(11) "Polling place," a designated place voters may go to vote where voting occurs;
(16)(12) "Poll watcher," a person chosen to observe the conduct of an election an
individual designated by a candidate, political party, or ballot question committee
to observe the conduct of an election;
(17)(13) "Primary" or "primary election," an election held at which candidates are
nominated for public office;
(18)(14) "Public office," an elected position in government;
(19)(15) "Qualified elector," an individual who is eligible to register, and has registered,
as a voter of this state;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 8 1324
(16) "Registration list," a list of eligible voters; and
(20) "Registered mail," does not include certified mail;
(21) "Registration officials," the county auditor and deputies and other persons
authorized to assist in registration pursuant to chapter 12-4;
(22) "Vote center," a polling place when the precinct has been defined as the entire
jurisdiction and an electronic pollbook is utilized;
(23) "Voter," a person duly registered to vote or one who is performing the act of voting;
(24) "Independent (IND)" or "no party affiliation (NPA)," any currently registered voter
who writes independent, I, Ind, no party affiliation, no party, no choice,
nonpartisan, or line crossed off in the choice of party field on the voter registration
form and any individual who is not currently registered to vote who leaves the
choice of party field blank on the voter registration form;
(25) "Independent candidate," notwithstanding the definition of independent as stated
in this chapter, any registered voter regardless of party affiliation who declares to
be an independent candidate for public office pursuant to this chapter;
(26) "Other," any voter who writes a political party not recognized in South Dakota in
the choice of party field on the voter registration form
(17) "Voter," a qualified elector, regardless of whether the elector is performing the act
of voting.
Section 7. That § 12-1-9 be AMENDED:
12-1-9. The State Board of Elections secretary of state shall promulgate rules,
pursuant to chapter 1-26, concerning prescribing:
(1) Forms The forms for voter registration and voter file maintenance;
(2) Forms The form and color of ballots;
(3) Forms The forms for notices;
(4) The uniformity of election procedures The procedures for conducting an election;
(5) The operation of the State Board of Elections; The implementation of the Uniformed
and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq., (January
1, 2023);
(6) The procedure to accept for accepting a petition and verify verifying petition
signatures;
(7) Petition forms The form of petitions, including petition size and petition font size;
(8) Envelopes The envelopes used for absentee voting;
(9) Instructions The instructions to voters and absentee voters;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 9 1324
(10) Recounts; and
(11) Post-election audits The process by which a recount is conducted;
(11) The process by which ballots are counted and canvassed after each election;
(12) The process by which a post-election audit is conducted; and
(13) The number of poll watchers that may be permitted in a polling place.
Section 8. That § 12-1-9.1 be AMENDED:
12-1-9.1. The State Board of Elections secretary of state may not authorize and
a political subdivision may not adopt or enforce in any manner a rule, resolution, charter
provision, or ordinance establishing a system of voting for any office where:
(1) Voters rank candidates in order of preference;
(2) Tabulation proceeds in rounds where in each round either a candidate is elected or
the last-place candidate is eliminated;
(3) Votes are transferred from elected or eliminated candidates to the voter's next-
ranked candidate in order of preference; and
(4) Tabulation ends when a candidate receives the majority of votes cast or the
number of candidates elected equals the number of offices to be filled.
Section 9. That § 12-1-10 be AMENDED:
12-1-10. The Board of Elections shall report to and secretary of state shall make
recommendations to the secretary of state Legislature concerning desirable or necessary
changes in the election laws of this state.
Section 10. That § 12-1-11 be AMENDED:
12-1-11. Except as otherwise provided by law, in any election in which all voters
of a county participate, the costs relating to the election shall an election in which all the
registered voters of a county are eligible to participate must be paid by the county, from
funds appropriated therefor. In all other elections, costs shall The cost of any other election
must be paid from funds appropriated by the governing body of municipalities, school
districts, and other political subdivisions the political subdivision requiring an the election
for their own purposes. Costs relating to a combined municipal and school board election,
or in the case of a combined election, may be shared under the provisions of §§ 9-13-1.1
and 13-7-10.1. Neither the state nor any political subdivision may accept any funds,
grants, or gifts for election costs from any source other than the governing body of a
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 10 1324
political subdivision, the state, or the federal government, except for gifts of a nominal
and intrinsic value as defined by the State Board of Elections and given in compliance with
the provisions of § 12-18-3. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules pursuant
to chapter 1-26 to prescribe the definition of nominal and intrinsic value.
The state or any political subdivision may not accept any funds, grants, or gifts for
election costs from any source other than the governing body of a political subdivision,
the state, or the federal government.
Section 11. That § 12-1-21 be AMENDED:
12-1-21. The State Board of Elections secretary of state shall resolve any
complaint filed under Section 402 of the Help America Vote Act of 2002, as of January 1,
2003 52 U.S.C. § 21112 (January 1, 2003), in accordance with the contested case
provisions of chapter 1-26. The complaint shall must be signed, notarized, and filed with
the secretary of state. The board shall. The secretary must resolve the complaint within
ninety fourteen days of its filing. The State Board of Elections may secretary shall
promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, governing the procedure for the complaint
process.
Section 12. That § 12-1-22 be AMENDED:
12-1-22. If the State Board of Elections secretary of state does not resolve the
complaint within ninety fourteen days of filing, the complainant may ask the circuit court
for alternative dispute resolution by appointing an impartial third party to serve as an
arbitrator to resolve the dispute. The arbitrator shall resolve the dispute within sixty
fourteen days.
Section 13. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 12-1:
The auditor of a county must provide an interpreter, proficient in both the local
Sioux dialect and the English language, in each precinct of the county for the purposes of
translating and communicating all voter instructions, if notified by the secretary of state,
in accordance with section 9 of this Act, that:
(1) The county contains:
(a) Any part of an Indian reservation and more than five percent of the citizens
of American Indian descent living within the reservation are members of a
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 11 1324
single language minority and have limited proficiency in the English
language; or
(b) More than ten thousand voting age citizens or five percent of voting age
citizens, whichever is less, who are members of a single language minority
and have limited proficiency in the English language; and
(2) The illiteracy rate of the citizens in the single language minority is higher than the
national illiteracy rate.
An interpreter must be paid the same amount as a precinct deputy. All expenses
associated with the employment of an interpreter must be paid out of the county general
fund or the appropriate fund of the political subdivision conducting the election.
If the person in charge of the election determines that a precinct does not need
the assistance of an interpreter, the auditor and the state's attorney of the county must
certify to the secretary of state that the precinct does not need the assistance of an
interpreter. The auditor and the state's attorney must provide documentation that
supports the determination as part of the certification.
The state's attorney of a county required to provide an interpreter, pursuant to this
section, may file an action against the United States in the federal court, pursuant to 52
U.S.C. § 10503 (January 1, 2026), to exempt the entire county from the requirement to
provide an interpreter.
For the purposes of 52 U.S.C. § 10503 (January 1, 2026), the Lakota, Nakota, and
Dakota dialects of the Sioux language are historically unwritten languages.
Section 14. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 12-1:
The secretary of state shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, to
establish:
(1) The process by which the secretary notifies a county that the county meets the
requirements of section 8 of this Act and must provide interpreters;
(2) The criteria for an individual to be employed as an interpreter;
(3) The process for certifying that a precinct does not need the assistance of an
interpreter; and
(4) The documentation required to demonstrate that a precinct does not need the
assistance of an interpreter.
Section 15. That § 12-4-1.2 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 12 1324
12-4-1.2. An individual applying to register as a voter shall answer the questions
and sign the oath as required on the voter registration form prescribed by the secretary
of state.
The voter registration form must include a certification of voter eligibility by which
the applicant attests, under the penalty of perjury, that the applicant:
(1) Is a citizen of the United States;
(2) Will be eighteen years or older on or before the next election;
(3) Is a resident of the state of South Dakota;
(4) Has not been judged mentally incompetent;
(5) Is not currently serving a sentence for a felony conviction; and
(6) Authorizes the cancellation of a previous registration, if applicable.
Section 16. That § 12-4-5 be AMENDED:
12-4-5. The county auditor shall enter in the master registration file the name of
each eligible person whose completed application for registration and mail registration
card is received no later than 5:00 individual in the master registration file, if the
individual's voter registration form is received by the county auditor or the local, state, or
federal agency responsible for conducting voter registration, pursuant to § 12-4-2, before
five p.m. local time at least, fifteen days preceding the election by the county auditor or
the local, state, or federal agency responsible for conducting voter registration under this
chapter. A voter registration completed.
If an individual completes a voter registration form at any local, state, or federal
agency during any week commencing on Tuesday through the following Monday shall, the
application must be sent by the agency receiving the application to the appropriate county
auditor by the agency receiving the registration or mail registration card no later than the
following Wednesday.
The State Board of Elections may secretary of state shall promulgate rules,
pursuant to chapter 1-26, to provide for the alternative transmission of voter registration
information by computer from the agency to the secretary of state.
The name of any voter who has registered to vote by 5:00 five p.m. local time,
fifteen days preceding a runoff election shall must be added to the file used for the runoff
election.
Section 17. That § 12-4-5.3 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 13 1324
12-4-5.3. When a voter registration application is received by the county auditor,
the county auditor or an individual designated by the county auditor shall review the
application for eligibility and completeness. If the applicant is not eligible to be registered
or sufficient information to complete the registration card cannot be obtained from the
applicant, the county auditor must send an acknowledgment notice by nonforwardable
mail to the applicant indicating the reason the registration was not filed. The
acknowledgment notice must state that the applicant needs to submit the corrected
information to the county auditor within thirty days or the voter registration form may not
be processed. The county auditor shall send an acknowledgment notice by nonforwardable
mail to the applicant whose registration is accepted. The State Board of Elections shall
promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, prescribing the form of the acknowledgement
notice. The same confirmation mailing required by § 12-4-19 must be sent immediately
to any person whose registration acknowledgment notice is returned undeliverable.
Upon receipt of a voter registration application, the county auditor or an individual
designated by the auditor must review the application to determine whether the applicant
is eligible to register as a voter and whether the application is complete. The county
auditor shall send a notice of acknowledgement by nonforwardable mail to an applicant
whose application was filed.
If the applicant is not eligible to be registered as a voter or if the application lacks
sufficient information to complete the voter's registration, the auditor must send a notice
of acknowledgment to the applicant by nonforwardable mail stating that the application
was not filed and the reason the application was not filed. If the registration was not filed
because the application lacked sufficient information to complete the voter registration
card, the notice must state that the applicant must submit the corrected information to
the county auditor, within thirty days of the date on the notice, or the application will not
be processed.
If a notice of acknowledgement sent pursuant to this section is returned as
undeliverable, the county auditor must send the confirmation mailing required in § 12-4-
19.1.
The secretary of state shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, to
prescribe the form of the notice of acknowledgement.
Section 18. That § 12-4-5.4 be AMENDED:
12-4-5.4. Any person registering to vote When registering as a voter, an individual
shall provide the person's individual's valid South Dakota driver license number or a South
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 14 1324
Dakota nondriver identification number on the voter registration form. If a person the
individual does not have a valid South Dakota driver license or a South Dakota nondriver
identification number, the person shall individual must provide the last four digits of the
person's individual's social security number on the voter registration form. If a person
If the individual does not have a valid South Dakota driver license, a South Dakota
nondriver identification number, or a social security number, the person individual may
only register only at the county auditor's office and shall must sign a the statement
verifying the fact prescribed by the secretary of state, attesting that the person individual
does not have a valid South Dakota driver license, a South Dakota nondriver identification
number, or a social security number. The statement shall be prescribed by the State Board
of Elections.
Section 19. That § 12-4-5.5 be AMENDED:
12-4-5.5. At the time voter registration information is transmitted from a county
to the statewide voter registration file, the secretary of state shall verify the authenticity
validity of the South Dakota driver license number or the South Dakota nondriver
identification number with the driver license database. If the applicant has provided the
last four digits of the person's applicant's social security number have been provided, the
secretary of state shall must review the social security database to determine that the
number, name, and date of birth are accurate and that this information belongs to the
person. If any of this information is reported as not being accurate, the applicant.
If, after reviewing the driver license or social security number database, the
secretary determines that the driver license number, nondriver identification number, or
social security number is not authentic, the secretary must notify the auditor of the county
in which the applicant is a resident. Upon receiving the notification from the secretary, the
county auditor must withdraw the voter registration and attempt to get the correct the
information with using the process provided in § 12-4-5.3.
The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26,
determining technical parameters for the driver license and social security database
verification.
Section 20. That § 12-4-6 be AMENDED:
12-4-6. An applicant for registration shall answer questions and sign the oath as
required on the form prescribed by the State Board of Elections. An applicant for
registration at a driver's license station shall also sign a signature card prescribed by the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 15 1324
Department of Public Safety. This signature shall be digitized and used to prepare the
registration card as provided in § 12-4-5. If an applicant is unable to write his or her
name, the applicant shall make a mark, the applicant's name being written near such
mark, and written by a person who writes his or her own name as a witness.
If the applicant is unable to write the applicant's name, the applicant may make a
mark. The individual who witnesses the applicant making the applicant's mark shall:
(1) Write the applicant's name near the applicant's mark; and
(2) Indicate that the individual has acted as witness to the applicant's mark by writing
the individual's own name under the applicant's name.
An individual applying to register as a voter at a driver license station shall also
sign the signature card prescribed by the Department of Public Safety. The signature must
be digitized and included on the voter's registration prepared by the county auditor,
pursuant to § 12-4-5.
Section 21. That § 12-4-9.2 be AMENDED:
12-4-9.2. A person eligible to vote under § 12-4-1 qualified voter may apply to
the secretary of state to be listed in the master registration file with a secured active
designation.
The secretary of state shall certify a secured active designation if an applicant
provides a sworn application that affirms one of the following, if the applicant provides:
(1) The applicantA sworn statement affirming that the applicant has obtained an active
protection order under chapter 22-19A or 25-10 or chapter 22-19A, which the
secretary of state shall verify with the Unified Judicial System; or
(2) The applicant resides inA statement from an official of a shelter established
pursuant to chapter 25-10. The applicant shall obtain authorization signed by an
official of the shelter.
Upon receipt of the application, indicating that the applicant resides in the shelter.
If the individual applies for a secured active designation affirming that the applicant has
obtained an active protection order under chapter 22-19A or 25-1, the secretary of state
shall must verify with the Unified Judicial System that the applicant petitioned for the
protection order and the order is active.
A voter record with a secured active designation shall must be excluded from public
inspection or copying, except if requested by. The secretary may provide information from
the record of a voter with a secured active designation only upon the request of a law
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 16 1324
enforcement agency, if directed by upon a court order, or if a secured active designation
has been cancelled at the request of the secured active designee.
A secured active designation remains in effect is effective for five years unless
cancelled earlier by the voter with the secured active designation.
The State Board of Elections secretary shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter
1-26, to prescribe the notices and forms, as well as any criteria and procedures for
approving applications pursuant to this section.
Section 22. That § 12-4-18 be AMENDED:
12-4-18. The clerk of courts shall, within fifteen days after the close of each
month, prepare an abstract from the records of the names of persons declared mentally
incompetent in the preceding month. The clerk of courts shall send the name of a person
declared mentally incompetent to the county auditor of the county in which the person
declared incompetent resides.
The county auditor shall remove from the master registration list:
(1) The names of persons identified as mentally incompetent in accordance with the
information provided pursuant to this section;
(2) The names of those convicted of a felony and sentenced to imprisonment in the
federal penitentiary system; and
(3) The names published in an obituary obituaries.
The county auditor shall match voter registration records maintained in or
transmitted to the statewide voter registration file with the death records maintained as
vital statistics records by the Department of Health, the social security death index, the
Social Security Administration master death file, and the records of felony convictions
maintained by the Unified Judicial System each month. Any voter identified as deceased,
as mentally incompetent, or who is as serving a sentence for a felony conviction must be
removed from the voter registration records.
The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26,
determining how voter registration records are matched.
Prior to providing a registration list to precincts, as prescribed in § 12-4-10, the
county auditor must certify with the secretary of state that all individuals required to be
removed from the master registration list have been removed based on the information
available to the county auditor at the time the certification is submitted.
The State Board of Elections secretary of state shall promulgate rules, pursuant
to chapter 1-26, prescribing to establish the process by which voter registration records
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 17 1324
are matched and to prescribe the form to certify for certifying the accuracy of the master
registration list file.
Section 23. That § 12-4-19 be AMENDED:
12-4-19. Any voter in the active registration file who has failed to vote, has not
updated the voter's registration information, and has not replied to a confirmation mailing
at least once during the last preceding four consecutive years shall be sent a
nonforwardable return-if-undeliverable address verification request. If the request is
undeliverable then a confirmation mailing prescribed by the State Board of Elections shall
be sent. If a county auditor has determined through a national change of address licensee
of the United States Postal Service that the address of a voter who is to be sent an address
verification request has changed, the confirmation mailing may be omitted. This process
shall be performed by each county auditor from January first to November fifteenth,
inclusive, of each odd-numbered year.
The county auditor must send a nonforwardable return-if-undeliverable address
verification request to any voter in the active voter registration file if the voter has not, at
least once during the previous four years:
(1) Voted;
(2) Updated the voter's registration information; or
(3) Replied to a confirmation mailing sent by the auditor's office.
The auditor shall send any verification request required by this section during the
period beginning January first and ending November fifteenth, of each odd-numbered
year.
Section 24. That § 12-4-19.1 be AMENDED:
12-4-19.1. The confirmation mailing notice shall be a double postcard stating that
the voter's registration may be canceled if the card is not returned. In addition, the card
shall state that if
If the address verification request sent pursuant to § 12-4-19 is returned to the
auditor as undeliverable, the auditor must send a confirmation mailing on a double
postcard that lists the voter's information as it appears in the master registration file and
provides the following instructions:
(1) If the information on the return card is correct, the voter must sign and return the
card within thirty days of the date of the postmark on the card or the voter's
registration will become inactive. The card shall also state that if;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 18 1324
(2) If the information on the return card is not correct, the voter shall must send the
correct information to update the voter's registration within thirty days of the date
of the postmark on the card or the voter's registration will become inactive.; and
(3) If the card is returned indicating a new address in another county in South Dakota
or another state, the card shall serve serves as a cancellation authorization.
The card shall must also give information on reregistering if the voter has moved
to another county or state. The card shall give the information about the voter as it
appears in the registration records.
The confirmation mailing may be omitted if the county auditor, after reviewing
information provided by a national change of address licensee of the United States Postal
Service, has determined that a voter who is to be sent an address confirmation mailing
has changed the address where the voter is a resident.
Section 25. That § 12-4-54 be AMENDED:
12-4-54. By March July first of each year, the secretary of state shall submit a
report to the State Board of Elections Government Oversight and Accountability
Committee, providing the number of voters removed from a each county's voter
registration list master registration file during the previous year due to inactivity, death,
felony conviction, mental incompetence, relocation to another jurisdiction, or as the result
of an application for correction,:
(1) Death;
(2) Felony conviction;
(3) Inactivity;
(4) Mental incompetence;
(5) Relocation to another jurisdiction; or
(6) A voter registration challenge filed pursuant to § 12-4-60.
The content of the report must be published on the official website of the secretary
of state.
Section 26. That § 12-4-56 be AMENDED:
12-4-56. A person registered to vote, pursuant to this chapter, may A qualified
elector may, using the form prescribed by the secretary of state, request that the auditor
of the county in which the voter resides elector is registered as a voter remove the person's
elector's name from the master registration list. If a person file. If a qualified elector
makes a request pursuant to this section less than fourteen days prior to before an
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 19 1324
election, the removal of the individual's elector's name is effective on the day after the
election. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26,
prescribing the form to be used by a person requesting the removal of the person's name
from the master registration list.
Section 27. That § 12-4-60 be AMENDED:
12-4-60. To file an application for correction, the individual must sign and file an
affidavit attesting that, to the best of the individual's personal knowledge and belief,
having exercised due diligence to personally verify the evidence presented, the challenged
voter is not qualified to vote based on one of the reasons set forth in § 12-4-58 or 12-4-
59.
The individual must provide the factual basis for filing the application, including the
information required by this section, in the signed affidavit. The application may not be
based on an unsupported allegation or the allegation of an anonymous third party. The
application must be in a form prescribed by the State Board of Elections secretary of state,
and must contain the:
(1) Name of the challenged individual;
(2) Address of the challenged individual;
(3) Name of the individual filing the application;
(4) Address, phone number, and email address of the individual filing the application;
(5) Date of the affidavit; and
(6) Reason for the challenge, pursuant to § 12-4-58 or 12-4-59.
The individual who files the application shall include documented evidence related
to the challenge as an attachment to the affidavit. The State Board of Elections secretary
shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, establishing the form of the affidavit
and the documentation that must be included with the affidavit as evidence of the voter's
qualifications.
An individual's social security number, driver license number, South Dakota
nondriver identification card number, passport number, or contact information, may not
be made public as part of a challenge. An individual who intentionally makes public any
information that is confidential, pursuant to this section, is guilty of a Class 2
misdemeanor.
Section 28. That § 12-4-61 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 20 1324
12-4-61. If a county auditor receives an application for correction, pursuant to
§ 12-4-60, and, after researching the voter, determines the affidavit raises a valid
challenge, the auditor must send a verification request to the voter named in the
application. The verification request must be sent by forwardable mail in compliance with
the National Voter Registration Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20501 to 20511, inclusive (January 1,
2025).
The verification request must be returned to the auditor within thirty days of the
postmark date and must include documentation sufficient to demonstrate the voter's
qualifications as a registered voter. The voter named in the application may request a
hearing before the county auditor to demonstrate the voter's qualifications as a registered
voter.
The county auditor must cancel a voter's registration if the voter:
(1) Fails to produce documentation sufficient to demonstrate the voter's qualifications;
and
(2) Has not voted or appeared to vote in an election during the period between:
(a) The date that the verification request was sent; and
(b) The day after the first general election following the date of the verification
request.
The county auditor may not cancel the voter registration of an individual challenged
pursuant to § 12-4-59, within the ninety days immediately prior to the date of an election.
The State Board of Elections secretary of state shall promulgate rules, pursuant to
chapter 1-26, establishing the process by which a county auditor must research a
registered voter to establish the validity of a challenge.
Section 29. That § 12-5-8 be AMENDED:
12-5-8. At the time of printing the official primary election ballots, the county
auditor shall also have printed in like number, and for each political party, separate ballots
upon which party voters may vote for precinct committeeman and for precinct
committeewoman of their political party. These ballots shall be furnished to any election
precinct having a contest for such position at the same time with the other election
supplies. The form of these ballots shall be prescribed by the State Board of Elections.
At the time the official ballots are printed for a primary election, the county auditor
shall also print a separate ballot for each political party upon which a voter may vote for
precinct committeeman and precinct committeewoman. The auditor shall provide ballots
for each precinct in which there is more than one candidate for precinct committeeman or
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 21 1324
precinct committeewoman. The auditor shall provide the same number of ballots for the
election of precinct committeeman or precinct committeewoman as the auditor provides
for the primary election pursuant to § 12-16-17.
The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the ballot for precinct
committeeman or precinct committeewoman.
Section 30. That § 12-5-21.1 be AMENDED:
12-5-21.1. A candidate for Governor shall nominate a candidate for lieutenant
governor by certifying the nomination to the secretary of state no later than five p.m.
central time on the second Tuesday in August in the year of the election. The candidate
for Governor and the candidate's nominee for lieutenant governor shall sign the
certification.
A candidate for lieutenant governor may withdraw from the nomination by filing a
request under oath with the secretary of state. If a candidate for lieutenant governor
withdraws, the candidate for Governor must nominate a replacement by certifying the
nomination to the secretary of state no later than five p.m. central time on the second
Tuesday in August in the year of the election. The candidate for Governor and the
candidate's replacement nominee for lieutenant governor shall sign the certification.
The secretary of state may not place the name of the candidate for Governor on
the general election ballot until a candidate for lieutenant governor has been certified.
The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26,
prescribing secretary shall prescribe the forms of the certification and withdrawal of a
candidate for lieutenant governor.
Section 31. That § 12-7-1 be AMENDED:
12-7-1. Any Except as provided in § 12-7-1.2 or 12-7-7, an independent candidate
for nonjudicial public office, except as provided in § 12-7-7, who is not nominated by a
primary election may be nominated by filing a certificate of nomination nominating petition
with the secretary of state or county auditor as prescribed by § 12-6-4, after December
thirty-first and by before five p.m. local time, on the last Tuesday of April at 5:00 p.m.
local time before the election. A certificate of nomination shall be executed before the
election. The nominating petition must be as provided in chapter 12-6. If the certificate of
nomination is mailed by registered mail by the last Tuesday of April at 5:00 p.m. local
time before the election, it is timely submitted A nominating petition is considered to be
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 22 1324
timely submitted if mailed by registered mail before five p.m. local time on the last
Tuesday of April before the election.
The certificate of nomination shall petition must be signed by registered voters a
number of qualified electors within the district or political subdivision in and for which the
officers are to be elected. The number of signatures required may not be less than equal
to at least one percent of the total combined vote number of votes cast for Governor at
the last certified gubernatorial election within the district or political subdivision. The State
Board of Elections shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, prescribing the forms
for the certificate of nomination.
Section 32. That § 12-7-7 be AMENDED:
12-7-7. Any candidate for President or Vice President of the United States who is
not nominated by a primary election may be nominated by filing with the secretary of
state, after December thirty-first and by the first Tuesday in August at 5:00 p.m. central
time before the election, a certificate of nomination which shall a nominating petition with
the secretary of state after December thirty-first and before five p.m. central time on the
first Tuesday in August before the election. The petition must be executed as provided in
chapter 12-6. If the certificate of nomination is The petition is considered to be timely
submitted if mailed by registered mail by before five p.m. central time on the first Tuesday
in August at 5:00 p.m. central time before the election, it is timely submitted. The number
of signatures required may not be less than in the year of the election. The nominating
petition must be signed by a number of qualified voters of this state equal to at least one
percent of the total combined vote number of votes cast for Governor at the last certified
gubernatorial election within the state.
An independent candidate for President shall file a declaration of candidacy and a
certification of the candidate's selection for Vice President with the secretary of state with
the candidate's nominating petitions petition. The candidate and the candidate's selection
nominee for Vice President shall sign the certification before the nominating petitions
petition are submitted.
An independent candidate for Vice President may withdraw from the nomination
by filing a request under oath with the secretary, pursuant to § 12-6-55. If an independent
candidate for Vice President withdraws pursuant to § 12-6-55, no, the independent
candidate for President shall have the candidate's name printed upon a ballot unless a
replacement selection for Vice President is certified to the secretary of state by the second
Tuesday in August. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules, pursuant to
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 23 1324
chapter 1-26, prescribing the forms for the certificate of nomination and the certification
for Vice President must nominate a replacement candidate for Vice President by certifying
the nomination to the secretary no later than five p.m. central time on the second Tuesday
in August in the year of the election. The independent candidate for President and the
candidate's replacement nominee for Vice President shall sign the certification. The
secretary may not place the name of an independent candidate for President on the
general election ballot until a candidate for Vice President has been certified. The secretary
shall prescribe the forms for the certification and withdrawal of a candidate for Vice
President.
Section 33. That § 12-16-1 be AMENDED:
12-16-1. The county auditor shall provide printed ballots for each election in which
the voters of the entire county participate. Except as provided in § 12-6-9, printed Printed
ballots for a primary election must contain the name of each candidate who has filed for
nomination and is approved. The printed ballots for the election of officers must contain
the name of each candidate whose nomination has been certified or filed with the county
auditor in the manner provided by law, unless the candidate is deemed elected by having
no opposition. The names of the candidates must appear on the ballot exactly as listed in
the declaration of candidacy of the candidates' nominating petitions.
Sample ballots must be printed on paper of a different color from the official ballot
but in the same form. The sample ballots and official ballots must be printed and in the
possession of the county auditor not later than forty-eight days prior to a primary or
general election. If there is a challenge pursuant to § 12-1-13 or 12-1-16, official ballots
may not be printed until the challenge has been resolved or until sixty days prior to the
primary or general election, whichever occurs first.
The county auditor shall prepare the necessary ballots, if any question is required
to be submitted to the voters of the county. Ballots for general elections must be of the
style and form prescribed in §§ 12-16-2 to 12-16-10.1, inclusive.
Section 34. That § 12-16-23 be AMENDED:
12-16-23. The county auditor shall cause to be printed, in large type on cards in
the English language, print voting rights notices and instructions in the English language
in large type on cards, for the guidance of voters in preparing their ballots in the form as
prescribed by the State Board of Elections and deliver the cards with the ballots in. The
auditor shall deliver to each precinct a number of cards sufficient numbers to meet the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 24 1324
requirements of § 12-16-25 at the same time the auditor delivers the ballots to the
precinct. The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the notice and instructions.
Section 35. That § 12-16-28 be AMENDED:
12-16-28. The person in charge of an election shall provide paper ballot precincts
each precinct with a the precinct's pollbook, in the form prescribed by the State Board of
Elections for each election precinct secretary of state, for the purposes of § 12-18-5. If
any jurisdiction uses electronic pollbooks, but does not use vote centers, the
The person in charge of the election shall must provide a printed paper voter
registration list and a printed and bound paper pollbook to each precinct in the jurisdiction
prior to the opening of the polls, if the jurisdiction:
(1) Uses an electronic pollbook; and
(2) Does not use vote centers.
Section 36. That § 12-16-39 be AMENDED:
12-16-39. The tally sheets for candidates for public office and submitted questions
shall be prescribed by the State Board of Elections.
The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the tally sheet used to tabulate
all votes cast at an election.
Section 37. That § 12-17B-2 be AMENDED:
12-17B-2. Any automatic tabulating or electronic ballot marking system used in
an election shall must enable the a voter to cast a vote for all offices and on all measures
on which the voter is entitled to vote. No automatic tabulating, electronic ballot marking,
or election voting equipment system may be connected to the internet. No ballot marking
device may save or tabulate votes marked on any system.
Each system shall must fulfill the requirements for election assistance commission
standards certification and be approved by the State Board of Elections prior to distribution
and use in this state. No system may be approved unless the system fulfills the
requirements as established by the State Board of Elections secretary of state before the
system may be distributed and used in this state. The secretary may not approve the use
of:
(1) An automatic tabulating system, electronic ballot marking system, or other election
voting system, if the system:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 25 1324
(a) Does not fulfill the requirements for the system, as established by the
secretary; or
(b) May be connected to the internet; or
(2) A ballot marking system, if the system has the ability to save or tabulate votes
marked using the system.
Any changes or modifications to an approved system shall must be approved by
the State Board of Elections prior to distribution and use secretary before the system is
distributed and used in this state.
Section 38. That § 12-17B-3 be AMENDED:
12-17B-3. Any A governing body having supervision of elections within any a
political subdivision may, by resolution, adopt, experiment with, or abandon any the use
of any automatic tabulating or electronic ballot marking system that has been approved
for use by the State Board of Elections secretary of state.
Any governing body may use the system in all or some of the precincts within its
jurisdiction or in combination with any other type of voting system that has been approved
for use by the State Board of Elections secretary.
Section 39. That § 12-17B-5 be AMENDED:
12-17B-5. Not more than ten days prior to an election, the person in charge of
the election shall conduct a test of the automatic tabulating equipment to ascertain that
the equipment will correctly count counts the votes cast for all offices and on all measures.
The test must be open to the public. The person in charge of the election shall
notify the county chair of each political party with a candidate on the ballot, any
independent candidate or candidate without party affiliation on the ballot, and the ballot
question committees for or against an initiated or referred measure or initiated
constitutional amendment on the ballot, of the testing of the automatic tabulating
equipment, one week before the test is conducted. The person in charge of the election
shall post notice of the time and place of the test in the same manner as a public meeting
agenda, pursuant to § 1-25-1.1. The person in charge of the election shall post the notice
of the time and place of the test to the secretary of state's website.
If an errorless count by an automatic tabulating machine is achieved by the test,
the person in charge of the election shall must certify the machine. The State Board of
Elections secretary shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, prescribing the
certification of properly functioning automatic tabulating equipment under this section.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 26 1324
If an error is detected, the cause of the error shall must be determined and
corrected. Once the error is corrected, the person in charge of the election shall conduct
a new test of the automatic tabulating equipment. The person in charge of the election
may not approve the automatic tabulating equipment until an errorless count is made.
Any additional testing required to achieve an errorless count must be open to the
public. The person in charge of the election shall post notice of the time and place of an
additional test in the same manner as a public meeting agenda, pursuant to § 1-25-1.1.
The person in charge of the election shall notify the county chair of each political party
with a candidate on the ballot, any independent candidate or candidate without party
affiliation on the ballot, and the ballot question committees for or against an initiated or
referred measure or initiated constitutional amendment of the testing of the automatic
tabulating equipment twenty-four hours prior to the test. The person in charge of the
election shall post the notice of the time and place of the additional test to the secretary
of state's website.
The secretary of state shall provide each county auditor with the contact
information for any independent candidate on the ballot, candidate without party affiliation
appearing on the ballot, and the ballot question committees for or against an initiated or
referred measure or initiated constitutional amendment in the auditor's county.
Section 40. That § 12-17B-5.2 be AMENDED:
12-17B-5.2. After the conclusion of the testing of the automatic tabulating
equipment, no software or firmware updates may be made to the automatic tabulating
equipment until after the certification of the election results. Each automatic tabulating
device machine must be sealed with a unique numbered seal. The person in charge of the
election shall verify immediately prior to the official counting of the ballots that the seal
has not been tampered with since the testing period and certification process pursuant to
§ 12-17B-5. The State Board of Elections secretary of state shall promulgate rules,
pursuant to chapter 1-26, prescribing the method of sealing automatic tabulating
equipment pursuant to this section.
Section 41. That § 12-17B-11 be AMENDED:
12-17B-11. Except for any specially trained technicians representing the
equipment vendor and required for the operation of the automatic tabulating equipment,
there shall be equal representation from each political party having a candidate on the
ballot and whose candidate on the county-wide ballot at the last general election received
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 27 1324
at least fifteen percent of the votes amongst those employed or authorized to receive,
process, or tabulate the ballots the person in charge of the election shall employ or
otherwise authorize to receive, process, or tabulate ballots, an equal number of individuals
affiliated with each political party that:
(1) Has a candidate on the ballot; and
(2) Had a candidate on the most recent general election ballot who received at least
fifteen percent of the votes cast in that jurisdiction.
The person in charge of the election shall submit the proposed list of employees
shall be submitted to each county party chairperson at least thirty days prior to the
election. Each person employee shall, prior to discharging any duties, take and subscribe
to an the oath as prescribed by the State Board of Elections secretary of state prior to
discharging the employee's duties.
Section 42. That § 12-17B-13.1 be AMENDED:
12-17B-13.1. If automatic tabulating equipment is located at a polling place for
processing ballots while the polls are open, the equipment may not be operated in a
manner which returns an over-voted or partially under-voted ballot to the voter. The
equipment shall be operated in a manner which returns any ballot that appears to the
tabulating equipment to be blank or has any possible mark which the tabulating equipment
cannot determine. If the ballot is returned to the voter, the voter may choose to remark
the ballot, obtain a new ballot, or resubmit the ballot.
Any central count automatic tabulating equipment shall contain the capability to
out-stack ballots and shall be operated in a manner to out-stack any ballot which appears
to the tabulating equipment to be blank or has any possible mark which the tabulating
equipment cannot determine. If the ballot contains any such mark, the resolution board
shall examine the mark and make a determination of any individual vote according to the
rules promulgated pursuant to chapter 1-26 by the state board of elections. The resolution
board shall make a duplicate ballot as prescribed in § 12-17B-14 which shall be counted
by the automatic tabulating equipment.
The automatic tabulating equipment that is located at a polling place to process
ballots while the polling place is open must be programmed to return a ballot to a voter if
the voter:
(1) Has over-voted or partially under-voted;
(2) Has left the ballot blank; or
(3) Made any mark on the ballot that the tabulating machine is not able to count.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 28 1324
If the ballot is returned to the voter, the voter may attempt to resubmit the ballot,
choose to remark the ballot and correct the error, or may obtain a new ballot.
The automatic tabulating equipment that is located at the location designated to
count all of the ballots cast in a jurisdiction must be programmed to out-stack ballots and
must be operated in a manner to out-stack any ballot that the equipment reads as blank
or has a mark that the equipment is not able to count. If the ballot contains a mark that
the tabulating equipment is not able to count, the resolution board must examine the
mark and make a determination regarding the ballot. When the resolution board has made
a determination regarding the disposition of a ballot that the tabulating machine is unable
to count, the resolution board shall make a duplicate ballot, pursuant to § 12-17B-14, for
the tabulating equipment to count.
The secretary of state shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, to
establish the procedure by which the resolution board examines marks that the tabulating
equipment is unable to count and make a determination about the vote cast.
Section 43. That § 12-17B-17 be AMENDED:
12-17B-17. The State Board of Elections may secretary of state shall promulgate
rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26 concerning, prescribing:
(1) The criteria and procedure for approving voting systems pursuant to this chapter;
(2) Notices The notices and forms used in the process of testing, using, and auditing
any voting system employed pursuant to this chapter;
(3) Test procedures The procedures for testing a voting system employed pursuant to
this chapter; and
(4) The arrangement and conduct of voting, absentee voting, tabulating, preparing
returns, and recounts.
Section 44. That § 12-17B-19 be AMENDED:
12-17B-19. The office of the secretary of state shall reimburse each county for
the cost of any the post-election audit required by §§ 12-17B-18 to 12-17B-25, inclusive.
The State Board of Elections secretary shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter
1-26, administering the reimbursement process and defining reimbursable expenses and
reimbursement rates for post-election audits.
Section 45. That § 12-18-6.2 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 29 1324
12-18-6.2. If a voter is not able to present a form of personal identification as
required by § 12-18-6.1, the voter may must complete an affidavit in lieu of the personal
identification before the voter may be given a ballot.
The State Board of Elections secretary of state shall promulgate rules, pursuant to
chapter 1-26, prescribing the form of the affidavit. The affidavit shall must require the
voter to provide his or her the voter's name and address. The voter shall sign the affidavit
under penalty of perjury.
Section 46. That § 12-18-7.2 be AMENDED:
12-18-7.2. If any person attempting to vote in any election claims to be registered
or any person attempting to vote in any election claims to be in the inactive registration
file but does not possess an acknowledgment notice and the person's name does not
appear in the registration list of the precinct, the person may vote if one of the members
of the precinct election board first confirms by telephone or other means with the county
auditor or a deputy auditor that the name was erroneously omitted from the list, and an
emergency voting card, in duplicate, in the form prescribed by the State Board of Elections
is signed by the applicant and each member of the precinct election board.
A member of the precinct election board must confirm an individual's status as a
qualified voter with the county auditor if the individual requests a ballot and:
(1) The name of an individual requesting a ballot does not appear in the precinct's
voter registration list; and
(2) The individual does not possess an acknowledgement notice, sent pursuant to
§ 12-4-5.3, indicating that the individual's voter registration was accepted.
If the auditor confirms that the omission of the individual's name from the voter
registration list was a mistake, the individual must be issued an emergency voting card,
in the form prescribed by the secretary of state. The card must be issued in duplicate and
must be signed by the individual requesting the ballot and each member of the precinct
election board.
The original emergency voting card shall must be retained by the precinct
superintendent as part of the precinct superintendent's permanent records, and the
duplicate shall must be given to the voter. In a primary election, the party affiliation of
any voter using the emergency voting procedure of this section shall must be designated
on the emergency voting card.
Section 47. That § 12-18-7.4 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 30 1324
12-18-7.4. Any person whose name appears on the inactive registration list in the
possession of the precinct superintendent may vote in any election following completion
of an affirmation of the person's address in this state.
An individual must complete an affirmation of the individual's residence address
before the individual is eligible to vote at an election, if the individual's name is included
in the precinct's inactive voter registration list.
If the voter has moved to a new address within the state, this the affirmation shall
must serve as a new registration. The affirmation shall be prescribed by the State Board
of Elections The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the affirmation.
Section 48. That § 12-18-40 be AMENDED:
12-18-40. Before giving a person a provisional ballot, the person shall complete
an affirmation. The person's name shall be written in the pollbook along with a designation
that the person has cast a provisional ballot. The person shall be given the ballot
appropriate to the precinct in which the person is claiming to be registered, along with a
provisional ballot envelope. After the person votes, the person shall seal the ballot in the
provisional ballot envelope and complete the statement on the envelope. The envelope
shall then be placed in the ballot box. The provisional ballot and provisional ballot envelope
shall be prescribed by the State Board of Elections.
An individual eligible to cast a provisional ballot shall complete an affirmation, as
prescribed by the secretary of state, before a member of the precinct election board may
provide the individual with the provisional ballot. The member of the precinct election
board providing the individual the provisional ballot shall write the individual's name in
the pollbook along with a statement indicating that the individual has been issued a
provisional ballot. The member shall also provide the individual with a provisional ballot
envelope. The individual must be issued the ballot for the precinct in which the individual
claims to be registered as a voter. After marking the ballot, the individual shall seal the
ballot in the provisional ballot envelope and complete the statement on the envelope.
The secretary shall prescribe the form of the provisional ballot, the provisional
ballot envelope, and the statement.
Section 49. That § 12-19-2.5 be AMENDED:
12-19-2.5. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules, pursuant to
chapter 1-26, to prescribe the absentee application form and a combined absentee ballot
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 31 1324
application form and return envelope for absentee voting in the office of the person in
charge of the election.
The application may be made by letter or upon any form containing the required
information or upon any form prescribed by the State Board of Elections or the postcard
form referred to in § 12-4-8.1, executed by any person authorized in accordance with the
An individual identified as covered by the provisions of the Uniformed and Overseas
Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq., as of January 1, 2023 §§ 20301
to 20311, inclusive, (January 1, 2023), may request an absentee ballot by providing the
person in charge of the election with a statement or form containing the information
required in § 12-4-4.4.
Section 50. That § 12-19-4 be AMENDED:
12-19-4. The return envelope for the absentee ballot must have printed on the
reverse thereof a statement to be signed by the voter. The State Board of Elections shall
promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, prescribing the forms for the return envelope,
ballots, and instructions to the voter.
The secretary of state shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, prescribing
the form of:
(1) The absentee ballot application form;
(2) The absentee ballot;
(3) The absentee ballot return envelope;
(4) The combined absentee ballot application form and return envelope for absentee
voting in the office of the person in charge of the election; and
(5) Any instructions to the voter.
The absentee ballot return envelope and the combined absentee ballot application
and return envelope must have printed on the reverse thereof a statement to be signed
by the voter.
Section 51. That § 12-19-9.3 be AMENDED:
12-19-9.3. The person in charge of the election may not establish or place, or
allow any individual to establish or place, an absentee ballot drop box within the official's
jurisdiction. A completed absentee ballot may only must be returned to an office of the
individual in charge of the election pursuant to § 12-19-7.
For the purposes of this section, the term, absentee ballot drop box, means a
receptacle or container into which an individual may deposit a completed absentee ballot.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 32 1324
This term excludes a county auditor's means for physically securing a completed absentee
ballot as required by § 12-19-10 or 12-19-42, including a secured and monitored
receptacle or container at the office of the individual in charge of the election. The State
Board of Elections secretary of state shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26,
prescribing the requirements to ensure the security of the receptacle or container located
at the office of the individual in charge of the election.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Section 52. That § 12-19-50 be AMENDED:
12-19-50. The tally shall be recorded on forms prescribed by the State Board of
Elections. A special pollbook shall also be prescribed by the State Board of Elections.
The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of:
(1) The tally sheet used to record the votes cast on an absentee ballot; and
(2) The pollbook used to document the voters who have voted by absentee ballot.
Except as provided by § 12-19-52, the tally shall of absentee ballots must be
recorded according to the precincts in which the voters are registered and then added to
those individual precinct totals the vote recorded for that precinct.
Section 53. That § 12-20-1 be AMENDED:
12-20-1. As soon as the polls are closed, the precinct superintendent and precinct
deputies shall audit the ballot count as prescribed in §§ 12-20-2 and 12-20-3. The precinct
superintendent and precinct deputies shall then immediately deliver the ballot boxes,
registration book, pollbook, and other election supplies, including voided and unused
ballots, to the counting board, if appointed, and sign a certificate of transmittal and receipt
as prescribed by the State Board of Elections. The:
(1) Audit the ballot count as prescribed in §§ 12-20-2 and 12-20-3;
(2) Deliver to the counting board, if one has been appointed:
(a) The ballot boxes;
(b) Registration book;
(c) Pollbook;
(d) Any voided or unused ballots; and
(e) All other election supplies; and
(3) Sign the certificate of transmittal and receipt prescribed by the secretary of state.
Upon receipt of the ballot boxes and other election supplies, the members of the
precinct election board or the precinct counting board or the precinct election board, if a
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 33 1324
counting board had not been appointed, shall then immediately proceed to count publicly,
in the presence of all persons desiring to attend the count, the votes received at the polls,
and continue without leaving the site of the count, in the presence of any individual who
wishes to observe the counting of the ballots, count the votes cast at the polling place.
The board counting the votes may not stop the count, and members of the board
conducting the count may not leave the site, until the count is completed. A person The
individual charged with implementing this section may not delay the counting of ballots
other than to authorize short recesses for the health and wellbeing of those employed to
implement this section. In counting the votes, the members of the precinct election board
or counting board shall use the tally sheets provided prescribed by the secretary.
Section 54. That § 12-20-7 be AMENDED:
12-20-7. Any ballot or part of a ballot from which it is impossible to determine the
voter's choice by using standards defined by the State Board of Elections shall be void and
may not be counted. If the precinct election board or precinct counting board is unable to
determine the voter's intent using the standards established by the secretary of state, the
board may not count the ballot and must mark the ballot as void.
The State Board of Elections secretary shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter
1-26, defining standards for determining voter intent.
Section 55. That § 12-20-13.2 be AMENDED:
12-20-13.2. The provisional ballot counting board or resolution board and
tabulation machine operators shall convene one hour prior to the convening of the
canvassing board. The provisional ballots, which the person in charge of the election has
determined are not invalid according to § 12-20-5.1, shall be counted to count the
provisional ballots that have been determined to be valid.
Upon completion of the count, the provisional ballot counting board or resolution
board shall complete a certification of the provisional ballot count and give the certification
to the canvassing board. The certification form shall be prescribed by the State Board of
Elections.
The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the provisional ballot certification.
Section 56. That § 12-20-13.4 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 34 1324
12-20-13.4. Within ten days after the official county canvass each person voting
by provisional ballot shall be sent by the person in charge of the election a notice advising,
the person in charge of the election shall send to each individual who cast a provisional
ballot a notice, as prescribed by the secretary of state, stating whether the individual's
provisional ballot was counted. The notice shall be prescribed by the State Board of
Elections.
Section 57. That § 12-20-18 be AMENDED:
12-20-18. After the votes have been counted, the members of the precinct
election board shall set down write in the pollbook and on the duplicate tally sheet on
forms therein prescribed by the State Board of Elections the name of each person voted
for, the office for which the person received votes, candidate on the ballot and the office
that each candidate was seeking, and the number of votes each person candidate
received, the. The number of votes that each person candidate received shall be expressed
at length must be written out as words.
Section 58. That § 12-21-2 be AMENDED:
12-21-2. The county recount board of each county which conducts a recount
authorized by this chapter shall be appointed by the presiding judge of the circuit court
for that county.
The presiding judge of the circuit court of the county conducting a recount, as
provided in this chapter, shall appoint the recount board for the county.
At a general election, a judicial primary election, or an election for a referred or
submitted question ballot question, the recount board shall consist of a recount referee
who is a duly qualified member of the State Bar of South Dakota and a member of the
political party that received the greatest number of votes in the county in the race for
Governor in the last gubernatorial election, and two voters of the county representing the
two political parties with the largest registration in the county. The recount referee must
be a qualified member of the State Bar of South Dakota and a member of the political
party whose candidate for Governor received the greatest number of votes in the county
in the last gubernatorial election.
In a non-judicial primary election or runoff election pursuant to § 12-6-51.1, the
recount board must shall consist of members of the same political party as the candidates
in the contest being recounted. The recount board must consist of a recount referee who
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 35 1324
is a duly qualified member of the state bar and two voters of the county. The recount
referee must be a qualified member of the state bar.
An individual may not serve on the recount board if the individual is a candidate
for the office that is the subject of the recount, or is the husband, wife, father, mother,
father-in-law, mother-in-law, son, daughter, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother, or
sister, whether by birth or marriage, of the whole or the half-blood, of any candidate
involved in the recount.
Prior to serving, each member of the recount board shall take an oath that the
member will act in good faith, with impartiality, and that the member meets the
qualifications to serve as a member of the county recount board. The State Board of
Elections shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, that secretary of state shall
prescribe the form of the oath to be taken under this section.
Section 59. That § 12-1-5 be REPEALED.
There is created a State Board of Elections to be composed of seven members, one
of whom shall be the secretary of state who is chairman. Two of the members shall be
county auditors appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives from a list of
nominees supplied by the county auditors meeting at the South Dakota Association of
County Officials. The auditors appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives
shall be of different political party registration. One auditor appointed in 1991 shall be
appointed for a two-year term and one shall be appointed for a four-year term. All
appointments of auditors after 1991 shall be for four years. One member of the board
shall be appointed by each of the following officers: the democratic leader of the Senate,
the democratic leader of the House of Representatives, the republican leader of the Senate
and the republican leader of the House of Representatives. Appointments to the board
shall be as follows: the appointee of the democratic leader of the House of
Representatives, 1980 and each fourth year thereafter; the appointee of the republican
leader of the Senate, 1981 and each fourth year thereafter; the appointee of the
republican leader of the House of Representatives, 1982 and each fourth year thereafter;
the appointee of the democratic leader of the Senate, 1983 and each fourth year
thereafter. After the appointments made in 1979, the terms of all appointed members of
the board, except auditors, shall be for four years. All appointments to the board are to
be made by January thirty-first of each year. Vacancies on the board shall be filled in the
same manner as the original appointments were made. All appointed members of the
board shall file with the secretary of state an oath in the form prescribed by § 3-1-5.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 36 1324
Section 60. That § 12-1-6 be REPEALED.
The per diem and expenses of the board shall be established by the Executive
Board of the Legislative Research Council unless otherwise provided by law.
Section 61. That § 12-1-7 be REPEALED.
The Office of the Secretary of State is hereby charged with the duty and
responsibility to serve as the secretariat of the State Election Board and shall assist the
board as may be directed by the said board.
Section 62. That § 12-1-8 be REPEALED.
The Office of the Attorney General shall provide such legal assistance as the State
Election Board may require.
Section 63. That § 12-3-6 be REPEALED.
Whenever the United States Department of Justice and the United States Census
Bureau, acting pursuant to Public Law 94-73, designate any county in South Dakota to be
covered under the provisions of the Voting Rights Act Amendments of 1975, the county
so designated shall be governed by the provisions of §§ 12-3-6 to 12-3-13, inclusive. The
secretary of state shall notify those affected counties that they are covered by the
provisions of Public Law 94-73.
Section 64. That § 12-3-7 be REPEALED.
The state's attorney of any affected county is hereby authorized to bring
appropriate proceedings, pursuant to Public Law 94-73, to exempt the entire county from
the provisions of that act.
Section 65. That § 12-3-8 be REPEALED.
Sections 12-3-6 to 12-3-13, inclusive, shall apply to all elections held within the
affected counties designated pursuant to § 12-3-6, and the person in charge of such
elections shall be responsible for the implementation of such sections.
Section 66. That § 12-3-9 be REPEALED.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 37 1324
The Legislature finds that the Lakota, Nakota, and Dakota dialects of the Sioux
language are "historically" unwritten languages and are defined as such by the provisions
of Public Law 94-73.
Section 67. That § 12-3-10 be REPEALED.
The county auditor of the counties affected by §§ 12-3-6 to 12-3-13, inclusive,
shall provide election assistance to any Indian by providing a person proficient in both the
local Sioux dialect and the English language in all precincts of the county for the purposes
of registration, voting and instruction.
Section 68. That § 12-3-11 be REPEALED.
Interpreters shall be provided for precincts as determined by the auditor or person
in charge of that election and interpreters shall be paid the same as precinct deputies. All
expenses shall be paid out of the county general fund or other appropriate political
subdivision fund.
Section 69. That § 12-3-12 be REPEALED.
If any precinct exists in any county that does not need the assistance of an
interpreter, the county auditor and the county state's attorney shall certify such facts to
the state board of elections. Appropriate proof shall accompany such certification.
Section 70. That § 12-3-13 be REPEALED.
The State Board of Elections shall have the authority, pursuant to chapter 1-26, to
promulgate rules to implement, administer and enforce §§ 12-3-6 to 12-3-13, inclusive,
and the state board of elections shall have further authority, pursuant to chapter 1-26, to
promulgate rules to implement, administer and enforce further federal administrative
rulings made pursuant to Public Law 94-73.
Section 71. That § 12-4-4.8 be REPEALED.
The State Board of Elections may promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 1-26 for
the implementation of §§ 12-4-4.2 to 12-4-4.9, inclusive.
Section 72. That § 12-4-7.2 be REPEALED.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 38 1324
Any local, state, or federal agency staff person who registers a voter shall ensure
that the registration card, as prescribed by the State Board of Elections, is filled out
completely.
Section 73. That § 12-4-8 be REPEALED.
For the purpose of expediting work of the county auditor, to promote uniformity in
registration, and for the preparation of abstracts and other forms to be used by election
boards, registration records shall be prescribed by the State Board of Elections. The State
Board of Elections may require such information, on registration records, as is necessary
to effectuate the state and federal election laws.
Section 74. That § 12-4-8.1 be REPEALED.
In lieu of forms for registration prescribed under § 12-4-8, requests for absentee
ballots submitted in accordance with the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee
Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq., as of January 1, 2023, are sufficient for registration
purposes. The county auditor shall make and file the index card for the master file and
attach the card thereto and shall save an electronic copy of the card. The county auditor
shall supply a photocopy to the election board of the precinct for the purposes of § 12-19-
2.
Section 75. That § 12-4-35 be REPEALED.
The State Board of Elections may promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 1-26
necessary for implementation of the National Voter Registration Act.
Section 76. That § 12-5-3.15 be REPEALED.
The State Board of Elections may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 1-26 to
implement §§ 12-5-3.6 to 12-5-3.14, inclusive.
Section 77. That § 12-6-5 be REPEALED.
The form of the nominating petition shall be prescribed by the State Board of
Elections.
Section 78. That § 12-6-14 be REPEALED.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 39 1324
The form of the official primary election ballot shall be prescribed by the State
Board of Elections.
Section 79. That § 12-9-13 be REPEALED.
The form of the nonpolitical judiciary ballot shall be prescribed by the State Board
of Elections.
Section 80. That § 12-16-2.1 be REPEALED.
The State Board of Elections shall, by rule adopted pursuant to chapter 1-26,
establish the color for sample and official ballots and of ballots to be voted in all elections
so as to differentiate between the political, nonpolitical, party, and ballot question ballots.
In primary elections, a separate ballot label booklet, marking device, and voting booth
shall be used for each political party holding a primary.
Section 81. That § 12-16-9 be REPEALED.
The form of the official general election ballot shall be prescribed by the State
Board of Elections in accordance with other provisions of the law.
Section 82. That § 12-16-10 be REPEALED.
If two or more members of the State House of Representatives or the county
commission are to be elected at large from a county, that portion of the official ballot shall
also be prescribed, in accordance with § 12-16-8, by the State Board of Elections.
Section 83. That § 12-18-8.1 be REPEALED.
The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 1-26
setting the number of poll watchers which are allowed in each polling place.
Section 84. That § 12-20-52 be REPEALED.
The State Board of Elections may, by rule, in accordance with chapter 1-26,
promulgate rules and regulations to clarify the procedure by which ballots are counted
and canvassed in all elections.
Section 85. That § 12-21-6.1 be REPEALED.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.274.23 40 1324
The State Board of Elections may by rule, in accordance with chapter 1-26, adopt
a code of regulations to govern the conduct of recounts.
Section 86. This Act is effective beginning January 1, 2027.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.